North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-27 State Aid

15.1-27-01.
Payments to school districts — Distribution.

The superintendent of public instruction shall estimate the total state payments to which a school district is entitled each year.

The superintendent of public instruction shall pay each district ten percent of the amount determined under subsection 1, within the limits of legislative appropriation, on or before August first and September first of each year. The superintendent shall pay each school district twenty percent of that amount, within the limits of legislative appropriation, on or before October first of each year.

The superintendent of public instruction shall estimate the amount that, in addition to the payments already made, is necessary to constitute the remainder of the amount due each district for the current school year.

On or before November first, the superintendent of public instruction shall pay to each district, within the limits of legislative appropriation, an amount that, in addition to the above payments, constitutes sixty percent of the sum due under this chapter.

On or before the first day of December, January, February, March, and April, payments equal to twenty percent of the total remaining payments must be made to each district.

If funds appropriated for distribution to districts as state aid become available after April first, the superintendent of public instruction shall distribute the newly available payments on or before June thirtieth.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2001, ch. 191, § 2; 2003 Sp., ch. 667, § 8; 2007, ch. 163, § 4.

Effective Date.

The 2003 amendment of this section by section 8 of chapter 667, S.L. 2003, Sp. became effective July 1, 2003, pursuant to section 42 of chapter 667, S.L. 2003, Sp.

15.1-27-02.
Per student payments — Required reports.

The superintendent of public instruction may not forward state aid payments to a school district beyond the September payment unless the district has filed the September tenth fall enrollment report with the superintendent.

The superintendent of public instruction may not forward state aid payments to a school district beyond the October payment unless the district has filed the following with the superintendent:

The June thirtieth student membership and attendance report;

An annual school district financial report; and

The personnel report forms for licensed and nonlicensed employees.

On or before December fifteenth, each school district shall file with the superintendent of public instruction the taxable valuation and mill levy certifications. If a district fails to file the taxable valuation and mill levy certifications by the required date, the superintendent of public instruction may not forward to the district any state aid payments to which the district is entitled, until the taxable valuation and mill levy certifications are filed.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2007, ch. 163, § 5; 2019, ch. 149, § 7, effective July 1, 2019.

15.1-27-03.
Cost of education — Determination.

The superintendent of public instruction shall determine the educational cost per student.

In determining the educational cost per student, the superintendent may not use:

Capital outlay for buildings;

Capital outlay for sites;

Capital outlay for debt service;

Expenditures for school activities;

Expenditures for school lunch programs;

Expenditures for transportation costs, including schoolbuses; or

Expenditures for early childhood education.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2011, ch. 147, § 20.

15.1-27-03.1.
Weighted average daily membership — Determination.

For each school district, the superintendent of public instruction shall multiply by:

1.00 the number of full-time equivalent students enrolled in an extended educational program in accordance with section 15.1-32-17;

0.60 the number of full-time equivalent students enrolled in a summer education program, including a migrant summer education program;

0.40 the number of full-time equivalent students who:

On a test of English language proficiency approved by the superintendent of public instruction are determined to be least proficient and placed in the first of six categories of proficiency; and

Are enrolled in a program of instruction for English language learners;

0.28 the number of full-time equivalent students who:

On a test of English language proficiency approved by the superintendent of public instruction are determined to be more proficient than students placed in the first of six categories of proficiency and therefore placed in the second of six categories of proficiency; and

Are enrolled in a program of instruction for English language learners;

0.25 the number of full-time equivalent students under the age of twenty-one enrolled in grades nine through twelve in an alternative high school;

0.20 the number of full-time equivalent students enrolled in a home-based education program and monitored by the school district under chapter 15.1-23;

0.17 the number of full-time equivalent students enrolled in an early childhood special education program;

0.15 the number of full-time equivalent students in grades six through eight enrolled in an alternative education program for at least an average of fifteen hours per week;

0.10 the number of students enrolled in average daily membership, if the district has fewer than one hundred students enrolled in average daily membership and the district consists of an area greater than two hundred seventy-five square miles [19424.9 hectares], provided that any school district consisting of an area greater than six hundred square miles [155399 hectares] and enrolling fewer than fifty students in average daily membership must be deemed to have an enrollment equal to fifty students in average daily membership;

0.082 the number of students enrolled in average daily membership, in order to support the provision of special education services;

0.07 the number of full-time equivalent students who:

On a test of English language proficiency approved by the superintendent of public instruction are determined to be more proficient than students placed in the second of six categories of proficiency and therefore placed in the third of six categories of proficiency;

Are enrolled in a program of instruction for English language learners; and

Have not been in the third of six categories of proficiency for more than three years;

0.025 the number of students representing that percentage of the total number of students in average daily membership which is equivalent to the three-year average percentage of students in grades three through eight who are eligible for free or reduced lunches under the Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act [42 U.S.C. 1751 et seq.];

0.002 the number of students enrolled in average daily membership in a school district that is a participating member of a regional education association meeting the requirements of chapter 15.1-09.1;

0.60 the number of students by which the district’s September tenth enrollment report exceeds the number of students in the prior year’s average daily membership increasing the factor annually by 0.10, not to exceed 1.00; and

For districts paid based on September tenth enrollment in the prior year, 0.50 the number of students determined by deducting the number of students in the prior year’s September tenth enrollment from the prior year’s average daily membership, increasing the factor annually by 0.10, not to exceed 1.00. If the prior year’s September tenth enrollment exceeds the prior year’s average daily membership, then a deduction of 0.50 the number of excess students, increasing the factor annually by 0.10, not to exceed 1.00.

The superintendent of public instruction shall determine each school district’s weighted average daily membership by adding the products derived under subsection 1 to the district’s average daily membership.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 6; 2009, ch. 175, §§ 30, 31; 2011, ch. 147, §§ 21–23; 2013, ch. 13, § 32; 2015, ch. 137, §§ 8, 9, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 149, § 9, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 8 of chapter 137, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 9 of chapter 137, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2017.

Note.

The 2015 amendment to this section by
section 8, of chapter 137, S.L. 2015, removed the expiration date of the section.

Section 15.1-27-03.1 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 9 of Chapter 137, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2031; and Section 8 of Chapter 137, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2031.

15.1-27-03.2.
School district size weighting factor — Weighted student units.

For each school district in the state, the superintendent of public instruction shall assign a baseline school district size weighting factor of:

1.36 if the students in average daily membership number fewer than 110;

1.35 if the students in average daily membership number at least 110 but fewer than 125;

1.34 if the students in average daily membership number at least 125 but fewer than 130;

1.33 if the students in average daily membership number at least 130 but fewer than 135;

1.32 if the students in average daily membership number at least 135 but fewer than 140;

1.31 if the students in average daily membership number at least 140 but fewer than 145;

1.30 if the students in average daily membership number at least 145 but fewer than 150;

1.29 if the students in average daily membership number at least 150 but fewer than 155;

1.28 if the students in average daily membership number at least 155 but fewer than 160;

1.27 if the students in average daily membership number at least 160 but fewer than 165;

1.26 if the students in average daily membership number at least 165 but fewer than 175;

1.25 if the students in average daily membership number at least 175 but fewer than 185;

1.24 if the students in average daily membership number at least 185 but fewer than 200;

1.23 if the students in average daily membership number at least 200 but fewer than 215;

1.22 if the students in average daily membership number at least 215 but fewer than 230;

1.21 if the students in average daily membership number at least 230 but fewer than 245;

1.20 if the students in average daily membership number at least 245 but fewer than 260;

1.19 if the students in average daily membership number at least 260 but fewer than 270;

1.18 if the students in average daily membership number at least 270 but fewer than 275;

1.17 if the students in average daily membership number at least 275 but fewer than 280;

1.16 if the students in average daily membership number at least 280 but fewer than 285;

1.15 if the students in average daily membership number at least 285 but fewer than 290;

1.14 if the students in average daily membership number at least 290 but fewer than 295;

1.13 if the students in average daily membership number at least 295 but fewer than 300;

1.12 if the students in average daily membership number at least 300 but fewer than 305;

1.11 if the students in average daily membership number at least 305 but fewer than 310;

1.10 if the students in average daily membership number at least 310 but fewer than 320;

1.09 if the students in average daily membership number at least 320 but fewer than 335;

1.08 if the students in average daily membership number at least 335 but fewer than 350;

1.07 if the students in average daily membership number at least 350 but fewer than 360;

1.06 if the students in average daily membership number at least 360 but fewer than 370;

1.05 if the students in average daily membership number at least 370 but fewer than 380;

1.04 if the students in average daily membership number at least 380 but fewer than 390;

1.03 if the students in average daily membership number at least 390 but fewer than 400;

1.02 if the students in average daily membership number at least 400 but fewer than 600;

1.01 if the students in average daily membership number at least 600 but fewer than 900; and

1.00 if the students in average daily membership number at least 900.

Beginning with the 2021-22 school year and each school year thereafter until the 2027-28 school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall assign a school district size weighting factor determined by increasing the baseline weighting factor under subsection 1 each year by fourteen and twenty-nine hundredths percent of the difference between the weighting factor under this subsection and the baseline weighting factor under subsection 1 for the same school district size. For the 2027-28 school year and each school year thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction shall assign a school district size weighting factor of:

1.72 if the students in average daily membership number fewer than 110;

1.68 if the students in average daily membership number at least 110 but fewer than 125;

1.64 if the students in average daily membership number at least 125 but fewer than 130;

1.60 if the students in average daily membership number at least 130 but fewer than 135;

1.56 if the students in average daily membership number at least 135 but fewer than 140;

1.52 if the students in average daily membership number at least 140 but fewer than 145;

1.49 if the students in average daily membership number at least 145 but fewer than 150;

1.45 if the students in average daily membership number at least 150 but fewer than 155;

1.42 if the students in average daily membership number at least 155 but fewer than 160;

1.39 if the students in average daily membership number at least 160 but fewer than 165;

1.36 if the students in average daily membership number at least 165 but fewer than 175;

1.33 if the students in average daily membership number at least 175 but fewer than 185;

1.30 if the students in average daily membership number at least 185 but fewer than 200;

1.27 if the students in average daily membership number at least 200 but fewer than 215;

1.25 if the students in average daily membership number at least 215 but fewer than 230;

1.22 if the students in average daily membership number at least 230 but fewer than 245;

1.20 if the students in average daily membership number at least 245 but fewer than 260;

1.19 if the students in average daily membership number at least 260 but fewer than 270;

1.18 if the students in average daily membership number at least 270 but fewer than 275;

1.17 if the students in average daily membership number at least 275 but fewer than 280;

1.16 if the students in average daily membership number at least 280 but fewer than 285;

1.15 if the students in average daily membership number at least 285 but fewer than 290;

1.14 if the students in average daily membership number at least 290 but fewer than 295;

1.13 if the students in average daily membership number at least 295 but fewer than 300;

1.12 if the students in average daily membership number at least 300 but fewer than 305;

1.11 if the students in average daily membership number at least 305 but fewer than 310;

The superintendent of public instruction shall impute an average daily membership for each school district that does not include a high school and use the imputed average daily membership to determine the school district size weighting factor under this section. To determine the imputed average daily membership, the superintendent of public instruction shall divide the school district’s average daily membership by 0.60.

The school district size weighting factor determined under this section and multiplied by a school district’s weighted average daily membership equals the district’s weighted student units. For the 2022-23 school year, for school districts that operate multiple kindergarten through grade twelve buildings at least nineteen miles [30.58 kilometers] apart, or multiple buildings at least nineteen miles [30.58 kilometers] apart with no replicated grades, the superintendent of public instruction shall determine the school size weighting factor for each building separately. The superintendent of public instruction shall multiply the school size weighting factor for each building by the school district’s weighted average daily membership to determine each building’s weighted student units. The superintendent of public instruction shall combine the weighted student units of all buildings in the school district to determine the school district’s weighted student units.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the school district size weighting factor assigned to a district may not be less than the factor arrived at when the highest number of students possible in average daily membership is multiplied by the school district size weighting factor for the subdivision immediately preceding the district’s actual subdivision and then divided by the district’s average daily membership.

aa.

1.10 if the students in average daily membership number at least 310 but fewer than 320;

bb.

1.09 if the students in average daily membership number at least 320 but fewer than 335;

cc.

1.08 if the students in average daily membership number at least 335 but fewer than 350;

dd.

1.07 if the students in average daily membership number at least 350 but fewer than 360;

ee.

1.06 if the students in average daily membership number at least 360 but fewer than 370;

ff.

1.05 if the students in average daily membership number at least 370 but fewer than 380;

gg.

1.04 if the students in average daily membership number at least 380 but fewer than 390;

hh.

1.03 if the students in average daily membership number at least 390 but fewer than 400;

ii.

1.02 if the students in average daily membership number at least 400 but fewer than 600;

jj.

1.01 if the students in average daily membership number at least 600 but fewer than 900; and

kk.

1.00 if the students in average daily membership number at least 900.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 7; 2013, ch. 13, § 33; 2015, ch. 137, § 10, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 141, § 10, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 10 of chapter 137, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment to this section by section 10, of chapter 137, S.L. 2015, was to remove the expiration date of the section.

15.1-27-04.
Per student payment rate. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2001, ch. 173, § 7; 2003 Sp., ch. 667, § 9; 2005, ch. 167, § 11; 2007, ch. 163, § 8; 2009, ch. 175, § 32; 2011, ch. 147, § 24; 2013, ch. 13, § 62; repealed by 2015, ch. 137, § 38., effective July 1, 2015.

15.1-27-04.1.
Baseline funding — Establishment — Determination of state aid. [Effective through June 30, 2025]

To determine the amount of state aid payable to each district, the superintendent of public instruction shall establish each district’s baseline funding. A district’s baseline funding consists of:

All state aid received by the district in accordance with chapter 15.1-27 during the 2018-19 school year;

An amount equal to the property tax deducted by the superintendent of public instruction to determine the 2018-19 state aid payment;

An amount equal to seventy-five percent of the revenue received by the school district during the 2017-18 school year for the following revenue types:

Revenue reported under code 2000 of the North Dakota school district financial accounting and reporting manual, as developed by the superintendent of public instruction in accordance with section 15.1-02-08;

Mineral revenue received by the school district through direct allocation from the state treasurer and not reported under code 2000 of the North Dakota school district financial accounting and reporting manual, as developed by the superintendent of public instruction in accordance with section 15.1-02-08;

Tuition reported under code 1300 of the North Dakota school district financial accounting and reporting manual, as developed by the superintendent of public instruction in accordance with section 15.1-02-08, with the exception of revenue received specifically for the operation of an educational program provided at a residential treatment facility, tuition received for the provision of an adult farm management program, and beginning in the 2021-22 school year, seventeen percent of tuition received under an agreement to educate students from a school district on an air force base with funding received through federal impact aid, and an additional seventeen percent of tuition received under an agreement to educate students from a school district on an air force base with funding received through federal impact aid each school year thereafter, until the 2024-25 school year when sixty-eight percent of tuition received under an agreement to educate students from a school district on an air force base with funding received through federal impact aid must be excluded from the tuition calculation under this paragraph;

Revenue from payments in lieu of taxes on the distribution and transmission of electric power;

Revenue from payments in lieu of taxes on electricity generated from sources other than coal; and

Revenue from the leasing of land acquired by the United States for which compensation is allocated to the state under 33 U.S.C. 701(c)(3);

An amount equal to the total revenue received by the school district during the 2017-18 school year for the following revenue types:

Mobile home tax revenue;

Telecommunications tax revenue; and

Revenue from payments in lieu of taxes and state reimbursement of the homestead credit and disabled veterans credit.

Beginning with the 2020-21 school year, the superintendent shall reduce the baseline funding for any school district that becomes an elementary district pursuant to section 15.1-07-27 after the 2012-13 school year. The reduction must be proportional to the number of weighted student units in the grades that are offered through another school district relative to the total number of weighted student units the school district offered in the year before the school district became an elementary district. The reduced baseline funding applies to the calculation of state aid for the first school year in which the school district becomes an elementary district and for each year thereafter. For districts that become an elementary district prior to the 2020-21 school year, the superintendent shall use the reduced baseline funding to calculate state aid for the 2020-21 school year and for each year thereafter.

The superintendent shall divide the district’s baseline funding determined in subsection 1 by the district’s 2017-18 weighted student units to determine the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit.

For any school district that becomes an elementary district pursuant to section 15.1-07-27 after the 2017-18 school year, the superintendent shall adjust the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit used to calculate state aid. The superintendent shall divide the district’s baseline funding determined in subsection 1 by the district’s weighted student units after the school district becomes an elementary district to determine the district’s adjusted baseline funding per weighted student unit. The superintendent shall use the district’s adjusted baseline funding per weighted student unit in the calculation of state aid for the first school year in which the school district becomes an elementary district and for each year thereafter.

Beginning with the 2021-22 school year and for each school year thereafter, the superintendent shall reduce the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit. Each year the superintendent shall calculate the amount by which the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit exceeds the payment per weighted student unit provided in subsection 3. The superintendent shall reduce the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit by fifteen percent of the amount by which the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit exceeds the payment per weighted student unit for the 2021-22 school year. For each year thereafter, the reduction percentage is increased by an additional fifteen percent. However, the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit, after the reduction, may not be less than the payment per weighted student unit provided in subsection 3.

For the 2021-22 school year, the superintendent shall calculate state aid as the greater of:

The district’s weighted student units multiplied by ten thousand one hundred thirty-six dollars;

One hundred two percent of the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, multiplied by the district’s weighted student units, not to exceed the district’s 2017-18 baseline weighted student units, plus any weighted student units in excess of the 2017-18 baseline weighted student units multiplied by ten thousand one hundred thirty-six dollars; or

The district’s baseline funding as established in subsection 1 less the amount in paragraph 1, with the difference reduced by fifteen percent and then the difference added to the amount determined in paragraph 1.

For the 2022-23 school year and each school year thereafter, the superintendent shall calculate state aid as the greater of:

The district’s weighted student units multiplied by ten thousand two hundred thirty-seven dollars;

One hundred two percent of the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, multiplied by the district’s weighted student units, not to exceed the district’s 2017-18 baseline weighted student units, plus any weighted student units in excess of the 2017-18 baseline weighted student units multiplied by ten thousand two hundred thirty-seven dollars; or

The district’s baseline funding as established in subsection 1 less the amount in paragraph 1, with the difference reduced by thirty percent for the 2022-23 school year and the reduction percentage increasing by fifteen percent each school year thereafter until the difference is reduced to zero, and then the difference added to the amount determined in paragraph 1.

The superintendent also shall adjust state aid determined in this subsection to ensure the amount does not exceed the transition maximum as follows:

For the 2021-22 school year, the transition maximum rate is one hundred ten percent of the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, multiplied by the district’s weighted student units from the previous school year.

For the 2022-23 school year, the transition maximum rate is one hundred ten percent of the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, multiplied by the district’s weighted student units from the previous school year.

For the 2023-24 school year, the transition maximum rate is one hundred ten percent of the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, plus twenty percent of the difference between the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection and one hundred ten percent of the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit. The transition maximum is determined by multiplying the transition maximum rate, which may not exceed the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection, by the district’s weighted student units from the previous school year.

For the 2024-25 school year, the transition maximum rate is one hundred ten percent of the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, plus forty percent of the difference between the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection and one hundred ten percent of the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit. The transition maximum is determined by multiplying the transition maximum rate, which may not exceed the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection, by the district’s weighted student units from the previous school year.

For the 2025-26 school year, the transition maximum rate is one hundred ten percent of the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, plus sixty percent of the difference between the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection and one hundred ten percent of the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit. The transition maximum is determined by multiplying the transition maximum rate, which may not exceed the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection, by the district’s weighted student units from the previous school year.

For the 2026-27 school year, the transition maximum rate is one hundred ten percent of the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, plus eighty percent of the difference between the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection and one hundred ten percent of the district’s baseline funding per weighted student unit. The transition maximum is determined by multiplying the transition maximum rate, which may not exceed the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection, by the district’s weighted student units from the previous school year.

After determining the product in accordance with subsection 3, the superintendent of public instruction shall:

Subtract an amount equal to sixty mills multiplied by the taxable valuation of the school district, except the amount in dollars subtracted for purposes of this subdivision may not exceed the previous year’s amount in dollars subtracted for purposes of this subdivision by more than twelve percent, adjusted pursuant to section 15.1-27-04.3; and

Subtract an amount equal to seventy-five percent of all revenue types listed in subdivisions c and d of subsection 1. Before determining the deduction for seventy-five percent of all revenue types, the superintendent of public instruction shall adjust revenues as follows:

Tuition revenue shall be adjusted as follows:

In addition to deducting tuition revenue received specifically for the operation of an educational program provided at a residential treatment facility, tuition revenue received for the provision of an adult farm management program, and tuition received under an agreement to educate students from a school district on an air force base with funding received through federal impact aid as directed each school year in paragraph 3 of subdivision c of subsection 1, the superintendent of public instruction also shall reduce the total tuition reported by the school district by the amount of tuition revenue received for the education of students not residing in the state and for which the state has not entered a cross-border education contract; and

The superintendent of public instruction also shall reduce the total tuition reported by admitting school districts meeting the requirements of subdivision e of subsection 2 of section 15.1-29-12 by the amount of tuition revenue received for the education of students residing in an adjacent school district.

After adjusting tuition revenue as provided in paragraph 1, the superintendent shall reduce all remaining revenues from all revenue types by the percentage of mills levied in 2020 by the school district for sinking and interest relative to the total mills levied in 2020 by the school district for all purposes.

The amount remaining after the computation required under subsection 4 is the amount of state aid to which a school district is entitled, subject to any other statutory requirements or limitations.

On or before June thirtieth of each year, the school board shall certify to the superintendent of public instruction the final average daily membership for the current school year.

For purposes of the calculation in subsection 4, each county auditor, in collaboration with the school districts, shall report the following to the superintendent of public instruction on an annual basis:

The amount of revenue received by each school district in the county during the previous school year for each type of revenue identified in subdivisions c and d of subsection 1;

The total number of mills levied in the previous calendar year by each school district for all purposes; and

The number of mills levied in the previous calendar year by each school district for sinking and interest fund purposes.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 13, § 34; 2015, ch. 137, § 11, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 135, § 4, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 149, § 10, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 141, § 11, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 161, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 11 of chapter 137, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

This section became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 15.1-27-04.1 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 11 of Chapter 141, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1388; and Section 1 of Chapter 161, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1246.

The 2015 amendment to this section by section 11, of chapter 137, S.L. 2015, was to remove the expiration date of the section.